Jack Dorsey’s future as chief executive of Twitter will ride on the answer to a single question: Can he persuade the world’s Facebook-addled masses to take a fresh look at the bewildering 140-character messaging service that he helped found in 2006, a service that millions have already tried and abandoned?He is apparently keen to act fast. A day after Twitter’s board announced the appointment of Mr. Dorsey as permanent chief executive, the company unveiled a long-awaited new feature aimed squarely at attracting people who now find Twitter too confusing to use. The feature, called Moments, tries to transform Twitter’s chaotic timeline into a series of narratives that are easily navigated by people who aren’t familiar with the service’s strange rituals.When you open Twitter on your phone or on the web, you will now see a new Moments section alongside the standard timeline. Tap it and you’ll be taken to a half-dozen or so headlines pointing to the big events currently being discussed on Twitter, like “Missing ship believed sunk” or “Clinton unveils guns proposal.” Tap again on one of these headlines and you will open that “moment,” which unfolds as a story told full-screen on a phone in a selection of tweets that have been arranged by a team of editors working for Twitter.A few news and entertainment partners — including The New York Times, BuzzFeed and Major League Baseball — have also been given tools to create Moments. While each Moment can be shared and viewed by anyone using the service, the Moments tab — which lists several daily Moments — is currently available only to users in the United States. In time, the Moments tab will be expanded beyond the United States, and eventually, the company says, all Twitter users can build the new tweet-based stories.Moments has been in gestation for nearly a year under the code name Project Lightning. The feature has been so thoroughly hyped by Twitter that when it rolls out on Tuesday, it is likely to look and feel a little less momentous than the save-the-company breakthrough that many observers may have been anticipating.Yet in several large and small ways, Moments marks an encouraging departure for Twitter, as well as a promising inauguration of Mr. Dorsey’s tenure. Though the new feature does not take anything away from Twitter as you know it — if you like the chaos, Twitter still has plenty of it — Moments suggests the company is willing to experiment with new ways of interpreting the service.Perhaps most important, the new feature shows the company inching toward something that has eluded it throughout its troubled history: a reason for being. For years, executives and devotees of Twitter have struggled to explain why they use it, or what anyone who isn’t a celebrity, politician, venture capitalist or journalist can get out of it.Now, Twitter is finally offering a simple, compelling case for the service’s mainstream utility. As seen in Moments, Twitter is the one place to find out exactly what has been happening in the world very recently. If Mr. Dorsey makes this use the foundation of his new tenure, the company could stake out a unique position among rival social networks. Twitter could offer a view of the world that is broader and timelier than the hyper-personalized, friends-based picture one finds on Facebook. Not only would a service offering an expansive look at the world be useful, it might prove widely popular, too.Moments was born out of a project started during Twitter’s hack week, an annual event held in January to encourage engineers to try new ideas. Madhu Muthukumar, the product manager for the feature, said the goal was to create an interface for people who “find Twitter too difficult to use, or for whatever reason haven’t gotten Twitter to work for them.”A major part of their difficulty, he explained, is a lack of context. When you open Twitter now, you feel at sea — tweets come at you from all directions, and it isn’t clear what’s important, what isn’t, and, in a larger sense, what’s going on. Twitter regulars (I’m one of them) find this rush thrilling. But for most people, the stream makes little sense.Twitter has rolled out several improvements in the last year to address this confusion, but Moments marks Twitter’s most dramatic effort to attract casual users. What is most surprising about the new feature is how willing the company seems to be to do away with many of the ideas that regulars have come to expect from the service. For instance, unlike Twitter’s main timeline, which displays tweets in reverse-chronological order without any kind of filtering based on a user’s interests, Moments presents a curated view of Twitter. The “Today” section of the Moments tab displays fewer than a dozen headlines chosen according to Twitter’s editors’ judgment about what’s important. Within each Moment, tweets are arranged in an order that makes the most sense to tell a story, not in the order they were typed.In other words, Moments tries to build context out of the crush of Twitter’s main timeline. If Twitter as you’ve known it so far is a rushing news wire of factoids, Moments is more like a newspaper — the statements arranged into stories, thoughtfully, artfully and in a way that’s comprehensible to the vast majority of people who aren’t interested in seeing how the sausage is made.Another novelty in Moments is a way of temporarily following certain people. Because its main timeline isn’t filtered, following someone on Twitter has long been a bigger commitment than friending someone on Facebook — follow someone on Twitter and you’ll see everything he or she tweets, whereas Facebook filters out stuff you aren’t interested in. But now, for certain events that are occurring live — like developing news stories, sports games or the weekly broadcasts of much-tweeted-about TV shows — Twitter will create a followable Moment. When you follow next week’s “Empire” Moment, for instance, your main timeline will display all the tweets that Twitter’s curators have selected about the show. When the episode is over, your timeline will cease displaying “Empire” tweets.One final thing to notice about Moments is its laid-back pace. Twitter ordinarily moves at warp speed — you look at the timeline to see what’s happening right this second, and anything more than a few minutes old disappears under the incoming tsunami of tweets. Moments, by contrast, feels slow; when you load up the main tab, you might see a headline from three or four hours ago, an eon in Twitter time.“We like to think of Twitter Moments as timely as opposed to real-time,” said Andrew Fitzgerald, who heads Twitter’s team of curators who will be crafting the new Moments. Moments, he said, reflect “things that are relevant but not necessarily happening at this exact instant, which allows us to break out of the ephemerality of Twitter.”Moments will not save Twitter. The product by itself feels too slight — it needs to be just one of many efforts to attract new users.Moments is also certain to raise novel problems for Twitter. Because picking and choosing news stories turns the company into something like an editor of news rather than simply a distributor, you can expect to see charges of bias or accusations of other ethical misdeeds that journalists regularly face. To guard against some of this, the company said it had shielded its curators from the advertising sales side of the company. Curators also refrain from choosing Moments that look like marketing for Twitter — hence, on Monday, there was no Moment pointing to Mr. Dorsey’s new job.Even if it does cause a stir, Moments looks like a worthwhile effort. For years, Twitter has been searching for its future. Now it has a new boss and, in Moments, a rough sketch for a new direction.First comes the immutably loud chime. Then the bright welcome message illuminates the screen. And these days, the inevitable ad is for the new Tom Hanks film, filling the back seat with the movie’s thumping score.For nearly a decade, the Taxi TV has intrigued and amused, but mostly annoyed, New Yorkers, disrupting the start of what should be a respite from the outside world with an inescapable incursion of sounds and sights. Along with subway delays and bridge tolls, the screens might top the list of city transportation complaints.But the monitors, which double as credit card payment consoles, could soon be muted for good.The city’s Taxi and Limousine Commission plans to vote Thursday on a pilot program that would remove the Taxi TV from some cabs and replace it with more modern — and less intrusive — technology. One possibility may be that taxi drivers hand passengers a smartphone or a tablet with a credit card reader to collect the fare.The program would for now be limited to 4,000 vehicles out of about 13,500 yellow taxis, but officials say the goal is to eventually retire the Taxi TV altogether. The commission said the repetitive programming and balky mute and power buttons have led to lots of complaints from passengers and drivers alike, and may account for people abandoning yellow cabs for Uber and other services.“It repeats itself constantly, and it’s just noise for no purpose,” Karen Hrycyna, 55, of North Brunswick, N.J., said on Tuesday morning as she waited for a taxi outside Pennsylvania Station.Largely a mix of movie reviews and advertisements for Broadway shows, some taxi clips have been more memorable than others. Cat Greenleaf’s celebrity sit-downs on her townhouse steps on “Talk Stoop” became a staple. But a video starring David S. Yassky, then the taxi commissioner, cheerily telling riders about a new model of taxi was panned because riders could not turn it off or mute it.Taxi officials have long debated how to improve the screens. A survey in 2011 found that riders thought the screens were nearly the worst part of a taxi ride, second only to the high fare. Of the 22,000 riders surveyed, 31 percent said the screens were their least favorite part of the taxi experience.Despite such sentiments, some riders say they like them. As she stepped out of a taxi at Penn Station, Alyse Lorenzo, 28, of Queens, said she liked Alex Trebek’s “Jeopardy” trivia clips that run in taxis.“I wouldn’t be distraught if they took them out,” she said. “But if you’re by yourself, it’s nice to have something to look at on your drive.”And last year, one of the taxi screens helped Mayor Bill de Blasio find a renter for his townhouse in Brooklyn when his family moved to Gracie Mansion — the tenants said they learned of the listing from a news report on Taxi TV.The current taxi commissioner, Meera Joshi, said the pilot program was an opportunity to try out more modern technology.“It is definitely something that over time could probably, and does, get irritating for our frequent taxi riders, and most certainly for our drivers,” Ms. Joshi said. “I think it feels somewhat dated today when you’re in the taxi.”Ms. Joshi declined to say whether she muted or turned off the screen when she rides in a taxi.If the pilot program is approved, the Taxi TVs will not be removed overnight. The commission will make sure the shift is a “deliberate process” and the new payment system is secure and accurate, Ms. Joshi saidMichael Woloz, a spokesman for Creative Mobile Technologies, one of two companies that provide the screens and other equipment for New York City taxis, pushed back against the notion that riders do not like the monitors. Many passengers, he said, find the news and weather updates useful.“It shouldn’t be shocking to people that a high percentage of taxi passengers actually watch the content and don’t mind it,” Mr. Woloz said.Some taxi drivers have opposed the screens since they were first discussed in 2003 and began to be widely implemented in 2007.On Tuesday outside Haandi, a popular restaurant for taxi drivers in Manhattan, Abul Hossain, 51, said customers do not like the noise.“I think 99 percent of them keep it off,” said Mr. Hossain, who said he had driven a taxi for about 25 years.Bhairavi Desai, the executive director of the New York Taxi Workers Alliance, said the mood among drivers over the change was “utter elation.”“The T.L.C. is eight years late in reversing a horrible decision,” she said, “but we’re glad the time has finally come.”Indeed, times have changed. In the age of ubiquitous smartphones, the taxi monitor is one screen too many, said Ryan Levine, 29, a musician who was walking past Stuyvesant Square in Manhattan on Tuesday.“Being in a taxi in New York is like a small escape,” he said. “You’re treating yourself. It’s not the subway. And so I don’t want to be getting blasted with a TV.”Bob McConnell, a retired engineer, set up a new wireless router in his home this year to get faster Internet speeds. Instead, he got the opposite, with his iPad often getting no wireless connection in his bedroom.For days, he tinkered with the router’s settings, but couldn’t figure out a fix. “It was totally ruining my life,” said Mr. McConnell, who lives in a condominium building in Kirkland, Wash. “Things would work, and then the next morning they wouldn’t work again.”What Mr. McConnell experienced is a situation we call “Wi-Fi headache,” and it’s an ailment that many can relate to. The condition is rooted in the networking devices called routers that people install in their homes for Wi-Fi connectivity. Most routers are difficult to configure for anyone who doesn’t work in an information technology department. Jargony tech terms like 802.11 or dual-band add to the confusion when people upgrade a router or try to decide which one to pick.So to diagnose and cure Wi-Fi headaches, we teamed up with The Wirecutter, the product recommendations website. The Wirecutter put dozens of top-rated routers and devices through hundreds of hours of testing to pick out the best router for most people and come up with other recommendations tailored to different living situations and budgets. It also ran new tests for The New York Times to come up with best practices for getting a stronger, faster Wi-Fi signal.The bottom line: People with devices both new and old will see an improvement by upgrading to a recent router that supports the latest Wi-Fi standards. But they should be wary of buying a cheap router that isn’t any good, or spending too much on one that is too complex for their needs.Why Your Wi-Fi StinksWi-Fi headaches start with how the technology has evolved. For years, router makers like Netgear, Linksys and Cisco focused on making Wi-Fi technology transmit data at higher speeds and over longer distances.That did little to prepare people for the explosion of Internet-connected mobile devices. In buildings crowded with smartphones, computers, smart TVs and tablets, the devices’ signals are now fighting for room on the same radio channels. And routers are spewing out energy for longer distances that may be bumping into neighbors’ signals.“The router manufacturers are kind of brain-dead,” said Dave Fraser, the chief executive of Devicescape, which develops technology for making public Wi-Fi networks usable for mobile phone service. “All they were thinking about was supporting people with laptops in their homes and commercial environments. All of a sudden Wi-Fi is in everything and everywhere, and we’re moving around our homes much more.”Router manufacturers have more recently improved Wi-Fi technology with mobile devices in mind, said Mr. Fraser. New routers often include smarter antennas that do a better job of assembling signals and beaming energy toward devices that are moving around.Some features inside newer routers also help reduce signal interference. Newer routers typically can transmit data over two radio frequencies — 2.4 GHz and 5 GHz — and give you the option to split them up into two separate Wi-Fi networks. In general, the 2.4 GHz band transmits data farther and is more crowded because many types of devices, like cordless phones and microwaves, use that frequency. The 5 GHz band is less congested but typically travels a shorter distance.Consumer behavior is also to blame for Wi-Fi headaches. People may wait years before buying a new router, so their devices might be more up-to-date than their infrastructure. An outdated router becomes a bottleneck that hinders the speeds of web downloads and file transfers between connected devices.Some people never upgrade routers, especially those who still use the router that their Internet service provider lent them years ago. Those routers, which often double as modems, are often slow and short-ranged. That means it is time to buy a newer, faster router.Test ResultsThe Wirecutter performed a battery of tests on two top-performing routers with six devices, and the results were unmistakable: If your current router is at least three years old, there is no reason not to upgrade to a new router.Not only can a newer router improve the speed and range for users, the routers typically have upgraded internal components and strong external antennas. Many also support the latest Wi-Fi standard — 802.11ac — which has top speeds that are nearly three times faster than the previous standard, 802.11n, for the fastest wireless devices you can buy today.Many smartphones, tablets and laptops released since 2013 support 802.11ac. But even older devices that support only the previous standard, 802.11n, can enjoy faster speeds at long range with a newer 802.11ac router.For these tests, The Wirecutter used two routers: its top 802.11ac router recommendation, TP-Link’s Archer C7, and an older 802.11n router, Netgear’s WNDR3700. It tried them with a 2012 iPhone 5, a 2014 iPhone 6 Plus, a 2013 HTC One M7, a 2015 Samsung Galaxy S6, a 2012 MacBook Air and a 2014 MacBook Air.To get an idea how each device performed with each router, The Wirecutter’s Wi-Fi expert, David Murphy, tested file transfer speeds, video streaming speeds, music streaming quality and video call quality at a short range of 11 feet and a long range of 43 feet.Most tested devices had 19 percent to 54 percent faster download speeds and shaved 3 to 48 percent off their file-transfer times when paired with the Archer C7 compared with the older 802.11n Netgear router. The devices also did better on the Archer C7’s 5 GHz Wi-Fi network than on its 2.4GHz network at the same locations. In comparison, The Wirecutter could not connect to the Netgear router’s 5 GHz Wi-Fi at its long-distance test location.The Archer C7’s exceptional performance on a 5 GHz signal is its strength. Devices often had the same download speeds at long range as short range when connected to the Archer C7’s 5 GHz Wi-Fi. But at the longer distance, when switched to the Archer C7’s 2.4GHz network, each device’s download speeds dropped, sometimes by more than 80 percent.In summary: For a stronger, faster wireless connection, stay on the router’s 5 GHz band for as long as you can. Older routers aren’t the best at that; a newer router like TP-Link’s Archer C7 is a much better option.Buying AdviceThe best router for most people is the Archer C7 ($100). It’s a dual-band 802.11ac router, meaning it can run both 2.4GHz and 5 GHz Wi-Fi networks, and it supports the fastest Wi-Fi speeds of every wireless device you can buy, including the MacBook Pro, the Samsung Galaxy S6 or the brand-new iPhone 6s. The Archer C7 is faster over longer distances than most routers that cost $150 or more, and it’s the best value of the more than two dozen routers The Wirecutter tested in the last two years.The Archer C7 isn’t for everyone. So The Wirecutter also combed through test results and picked some routers for different living situations, such as small apartments or homes where people primarily use Apple devices.Generally, we recommend you upgrade to a new router every three to four years. That accounts for how often people typically upgrade devices like smartphones (every two years) and computers (every three to four years).Yet whether your smartphones, computers and tablets are one, two or five years old, now is a good time to buy a new router if you haven’t in the last three years. Newer devices are probably using the 802.11ac standard, so you will get the fastest speeds at long distances with an 802.11ac router. If you hoard old devices, you will also get faster speeds and greater range. These benefits will be especially clear if you stay on a 5 GHz Wi-Fi network for as long as you can.One caveat: If you use a slower Internet service like DSL, you can probably hold on to a router for longer than three years. A newer router can still be useful because of the improved wireless range, but you won’t experience a big difference in speeds.If your house is so large that a new router won’t be able to cover every inch with a great Wi-Fi signal, you could install a Wi-Fi extender, which enhances an existing Wi-Fi connection to increase coverage. Powerline networking, which converts a house’s electrical wiring into a wired Internet connection, is another option, but you’ll have to check if your home supports it.As for Mr. McConnell, the retired engineer eventually solved his Wi-Fi headache by setting up his devices to stay on the 5 GHz radio band. To get a Wi-Fi signal to his iPad in the bedroom, he also set up an extender. Now everything is smooth sailing, he said.“I’ve got my life back,” he said.SAN FRANCISCO —  Jack Dorsey has been permanent chief executive of Twitter for slightly more than a week. He has already decided that to grow, the company needs to shrink.Twitter announced on Tuesday that it was laying off as many as 336 employees, or 8 percent of its work force, to streamline and refocus as it tries to find ways to attract new users to its social network.“We are moving forward with a restructuring of our work force so we can put our company on a stronger path to grow,” Mr. Dorsey, one of the founders of Twitter, wrote in an email to employees. “We feel strongly that engineering will move much faster with a smaller and nimbler team, while remaining the biggest percentage of our work force. And the rest of the organization will be streamlined in parallel.”The cuts, one of the first major moves by Mr. Dorsey since he was named chief executive, received a mixed reaction from Wall Street. News of the impending layoffs leaked out Friday, after the market closed, and Twitter’s shares fell nearly 7 percent on Monday. After the staff cuts were announced Tuesday morning, the stock rebounded briefly and ended the day at $29.06, up 1 percent.“Cutting 8 percent of your work force is a little jarring,” said Mark Mahaney, an Internet analyst at RBC Capital Markets. “You don’t normally see job cuts at this early stage for growth companies unless there is something materially going wrong with the operations or the strategy.”Twitter’s growth team, which has been responsible for various efforts to attract new users, has been a particular target of recent revamping efforts, according to current and former employees, who spoke on condition of anonymity.This year, Alex Roetter, Twitter’s head of engineering, decided to bring the growth initiatives under more central control. In July, the leader of the growth efforts, Christian Oestlien, left for Google’s YouTube. Since then, his former team has gradually dissolved, with some members reassigned, some quitting for other companies and others laid off on Tuesday.One member of that team, Bart Teeuwisse, tweeted that he learned he had lost his job when he tried to log in to his email Tuesday morning and got an error message.A Twitter spokeswoman declined to comment beyond the company’s securities filing about the layoffs.Twitter’s work force has grown quickly in recent years, through acquisitions and hiring. As of June 30, the company, which is based in San Francisco, had about 4,100 employees, an increase of more than 800 people, or 24 percent, from the previous June.Twitter’s struggle to add and retain users remains Wall Street’s top concern about the company.Advertisers, the principal source of Twitter’s revenue, have also complained that Twitter’s offerings are less compelling than those of Facebook and Google.Mr. Dorsey and other top executives have acknowledged that the service remains too difficult to use, and they have warned that a turnaround will not be quick. As of the second quarter, the company had 316 million users, up 15 percent from the previous year.Twitter said Tuesday that revenue and adjusted profit for the third quarter would meet or exceed previous forecasts. The high end of the company’s previous forecast predicted revenue of $560 million and adjusted earnings of $115 million.The company said it would provide “generous” exit packages to those who are losing their jobs, including 60 days of pay for San Francisco employees, which is required under a provision of state law governing large layoffs. Twitter intends to take a pretax charge of $5 million to $15 million in the fourth quarter in connection with the layoffs.Demand for software engineers is intense in Silicon Valley, and former Twitter employees were quick to reach out to those laid off and urge them to join them at other companies.Dale Harrison, now an engineering manager at Facebook, tweeted, “If you’re out there looking for what’s next or just want to chat, DM me,” referring to Twitter’s private messaging system.Chris Aniszczyk, who worked at Twitter’s open source team in Austin, Tex., and left the company two weeks ago, even posted a list — on Twitter — of job openings at other companies, including Microsoft and Instacart.SAN FRANCISCO — The Intel Corporation is changing with the times.Intel became the world’s biggest producer of semiconductors thanks mostly to personal computers, which eventually led to chips for server computers.Now, the new hot trend of cloud computing — data centers filled with tightly connected servers — is remaking Intel.On Tuesday, Intel, based in Santa Clara, Calif., said that in the three months that ended Sept. 26, PC chips brought in $8.5 billion and chips for servers in cloud computing data centers brought in $4.1 billion. A year ago, PC chips brought in $9.2 billion and data center chips brought in $3.7 billion.The shifting businesses at Intel reflect broader changes in the computing industry, and what Intel chooses to focus on can affect the choices of many other companies.PC sales are in a long decline, as customers increasingly use online services connected to mobile devices. While Microsoft and others try to revive the market with new designs and tabletlike models, in the most recent quarter worldwide PC shipments fell 10.8 percent from the year before, according to IDC.Making PC chips is still a big business, but not the way it once was. The data center group also has much higher profit margins: Operating profit from PC chips was $2.1 billion, down 20 percent from a year ago, while data center chips had an operating profit of $2.1 billion, up 9 percent.That matters, because Intel is already stressing products in networking and advanced cloud systems, to feed the profitability of cloud systems as PCs continue to wane. That means cloud computing leaders like Amazon and Google could benefit even more, and expand their online operations.Having missed much of the market for chips in mobile devices, Intel is also investing in sensors for devices connected to cloud systems.“If you zoom out, we’re not a PC company anymore,” Stacy J. Smith, Intel’s chief financial officer, said in an interview. “We still work with PC companies, but we’re deeply involved in automotive, wearables, all kinds of new devices.”Last month, Intel even sponsored Fashion Week in New York, stressing the convergence of clothing and computing.Intel’s net income for the third quarter was 64 cents a share, above the projections of Wall Street analysts. According to a survey by Thomson Reuters, analysts thought Intel would make 59 cents a share, down from 66 cents a year ago. Revenue was $14.5 billion, down slightly from $14.6 billion a year ago, and above projections of $14.2 billion.Intel shares were down about 3.5 percent in after-hours trading, in part because of a projected fourth-quarter dip in demand from cloud companies.“The Intel story has become a tale of two divisions,” said Bill Kreher, an analyst with Edward Jones. “Data centers show incredible headway. There will come a time soon when it will outweigh PC chips.”That doesn’t mean doom for Intel, as the unexpected profitability suggests. All those connected devices increasingly talk with companies that use cloud computing technology and Intel makes most of the chips that go into the servers in the data centers of cloud systems.It does mean Intel has to work hard to be a different company.“About 30 percent of our server business is now to cloud companies, and growing at a fast clip,” said Diane Bryant, head of Intel’s data center group, in a recent interview. “It’s the new opportunity for our revenue stream.”Intel is trying to enter the mobile business and sensors too, so far with little impact. The shift to more data center chips means lots of things will change for Intel, not least the kinds of customers it works with.Intel’s mix of cloud-computing customers shows how much influence is wielded by just a handful of big operations. Of 200 cloud company customers that Intel tracks, just seven take one-third of those chips: Google, Amazon Web Services, Microsoft and Facebook, as well as Baidu, Alibaba and Tencent of China.While the rest are now growing at twice the rate of the top seven, Ms. Bryant said, the big companies are unusually demanding customers, even designing their own chip modifications to make their global clouds work better.“More and more of them have custom microprocessors from us,” she said. “What is really different is the pace of their market. They deploy our next-generation processors six months before we formally launch them, buying tens of thousands of chips that they ship to themselves.”In addition, from all the cloud companies 80 percent of every new major purchase is for a more powerful chip. The newer and more powerful chips tend to have even higher profit margins, and also spur Intel to develop new things faster. Last week Amazon announced it would soon have Intel’s most powerful chip available in its cloud.The changes come while Intel’s traditional customers undergo their own radical changes. On Monday Dell, a big maker of servers and PCs, announced it was buying the data storage giant EMC. On Nov. 2, the server and storage businesses of Hewlett-Packard will split off from its PC business, in what top executives hope is a move for a faster-moving business.Intel may also face new competitors in the cloud business. Last week Qualcomm, a major producer of chips for smartphones, announced a big move into chips that work well in cloud systems.On the surface, Dell’s $67 billion buyout of EMC would seem to be all about going private. But this enormous tech deal also means the return of Dell to the public markets, just a few short years after the company fled them.That people have missed this point is not surprising, since Dell has not trumpeted it. But a person close to the company who spoke on condition of anonymity has confirmed that Dell will essentially become a public company with its acquisition of EMC.The reason is the tracking stock that Dell will issue as part of the transaction. EMC owns roughly 81 percent of VMware, which before the announcement of the deal had a market value of more than $35 billion. Dell could not afford to buy all of EMC, including the interest in VMware. So instead, Dell is paying the cash consideration and issuing a tracking stock to EMC shareholders.The tracking stock tracks EMC shareholders’ interest in VMware and is intended to reflect part of the value of the VMware interest that will be held by Dell. In all, according to the person close to Dell, former shareholders of EMC will hold tracking stock equivalent to about 65 percent of VMware, with Dell directly retaining about 17 percent and the rest publicly traded. It’s a neat trick. By issuing this tracking stock, Dell can afford to buy EMC, something it otherwise couldn’t, and still keep control of VMware.But there are costs here, and that is where the going public part comes in.A tracking stock is really just a new class of stock issued by the company. Tracking stocks have been around for a few decades. The trend began when General Motors used a tracking stock for its Hughes subsidiary and experienced a boom during the tech bubble. Back then, tracking stocks were issued by companies like Walt Disney to mimic an interest in Internet businesses (Go.com, in Disney’s case) while also keeping control with the main company.But tracking stocks were unwieldy beasts and created legal issues as companies struggled to reconcile the fact they controlled and owned a company but had to pay heed to the holders of the tracking stock, which really was a share of the company itself. For example, a business decision hurting the business subject to the tracking stock to the greater benefit of the whole company could be challenged by the holders of the tracking stock.Dell’s tracking stock solves some of these issues. It is not based on a business, but rather simply tracks VMware shares. And again, it is not even an interest in VMware stock, but instead is stock in Dell with the only rights to the proceeds of any sale of VMware shares or any dividends paid on VMWare shares. It does not raise the same legal issues as a stock that tracks an entire subsidiary.But since a tracking stock like this will be a class of Dell’s own stock and publicly held, this will mean that Dell is about to become a public company. It will have to register the tracking stock (which is really just Dell stock) with the Securities and Exchange Commission. More important, Dell will again be subject to all of the disclosure requirements of being public. (The company already does disclose some financial information confidentially to its debtholders.)Dell will have to disclose its financials and other information about the company and file quarterly and yearly reports. Again, this is because the tracking stock is really stock in Dell that gives the holder the right to all of the profits from the VMware stock held by Dell. And so Dell must report all of its information.So Dell is triumphantly, if not quite openly, returning to the public markets. The only difference is that Dell’s equity will be controlled by Michael Dell, Silver Lake and the rest of the buyout group. There will be no pesky shareholder to deal with who can influence this group. Still, it will be interesting how the public spotlight on Dell’s results changes views of the company. And despite Michael S. Dell’s complaints about operating in the public markets, it clearly couldn’t have been so bad for Dell if it is so quickly returning.It remains to be seen what happens with this tracking stock in the future. The arrangement gives Dell control of VMware for the foreseeable future and allows Dell to include VMware in its one-stop-shopping strategy, the reason it is buying EMC in the first place. In addition, it may be difficult to unwind the tracker even to arrange an exchange of tracking stock for actual VMware stock on a tax-efficient basis. It means that VMware is not going to be bought out any time soon, the reason its shares fell almost 10 percent when the deal was announced.On the flip side, Dell may have to buy out the tracking stock at some point if it wants to fully regain control of VMware. This will have to wait until Dell has more cash. But still, even then Dell may choose not to do so given that right now it will have control of VMware without having to pay tens of billions of dollars. The only price really is that Dell is back in the public eye, and that seems to be a cost Dell is willing to bear.Welcome back to the stock market, Dell. We missed you.Now that we’ve passed the fall equinox, it is time for the weather to cool off and the trees to change color. This also means it’s time to talk about autumnal apps.Going for country walks is one of my favorite fall pastimes, especially when I can find orange leaves. Because I’m curious, I also like to try to identify which tree is which, and I use Leafsnap, perhaps the best-known tree identifier app. The app has several sections, starting with a fun game. Images of leaves from different tree species blow around the screen, and you move each one onto a box matching the right name. It’s simple but fun for a few moments, and it could be a good way to learn leaf shapes.The main part of Leafsnap is a huge index of tree species found in North America; each entry has its own small leaf graphic. You can view the list alphabetically by common or scientific name or search to find a particular reference. Tapping on a list entry takes you to an album of photos that show foliage, fruit and bark in more detail. A page of text tells you about the tree, including its habitat, life span and where it is usually found.Using this list means you have to know a bit about trees to start with. But the app also has a section where you can snap a photo of a leaf on a white background and it will try to automatically identify the species for you. The accuracy can be hit-or-miss, and while some app store reviewers have complained that the system can be buggy, I have generally had good luck. The app also may not have all the tree types for your part of the United States. Since the app is free on iOS, it’s worth trying.A great equivalent to Leafsnap on Android is the free Virginia Tech Tree ID app. This app also has thousands of photos to help you identify autumnal trees. Instead of an image recognition system, it uses your GPS location and your entries in a checklist, like leaf shape and arrangement, to narrow the list of potential trees. It’s not the most elegant looking app, and its menu system feels awkward sometimes, but it’s definitely full of data that could add interest to a stroll in the forest.For a good guide to help you explore the autumn scenery in the countryside, check out the AllTrails app, free on iOS and Android. It’s a comprehensive guide to trails you can hike or bike, and you can either browse the trails it recommends or simply search for those near your location. The app also has offline content should you roam beyond cell tower range. It even has topographic maps so you can see how challenging a particular trail can be.This app is graphically rich, full of photos and advice, and it’s free, although some features like offline maps and access to National Geographic topography maps require a paid upgrade of $50 for a year.Autumn scenery also makes for good eye-candy on your phone, and the Autumn Leaves selection in HD Gyro 3D animated wallpaper for Android is a great example. It’s a pretty 3-D graphical autumn tree scene that moves to simulate a 3-D perspective effect as you rotate your phone. The app is free, and it is free of advertisements. For lock screen and background images on iOS devices, check out the app HD Wallpapers and Backgrounds by Rise Up Labs, which is free. It contains thousands of images in different categories, including some attractive autumnal ones. Beware of pop-up ads in this app, though.Thoroughly organizing and cleaning the house is something I do in the autumn instead of spring, because I figure I’m going to be spending more time indoors for the next few months. The BrightNest app, free on iOS and Android, is a great companion for a deep clean exercise because the app’s attractive design, cheerful style and interesting content actually make the task less boring.The app has thousands of tips for good home-cleaning practices, each explained clearly and well illustrated. If you sign up to a free account, you can enter details of your home and receive customized tips to suit your needs. You can even schedule tasks ahead of time and have the app remind you. It’s actually fun to use BrightNest — which may be something you wouldn’t expect from a cleaning app.This fall-themed column wouldn’t be complete without a pumpkin-related app, and the Pumpkin Recipes app by NetSummitApps is it. The app contains more than 200 recipes organized into categories, including pumpkin bread, pumpkin breakfast snaps and, of course, pumpkin pie. The food looks good, and the app is free.Enjoy these autumn apps but remember to tear your eyes away from your phone screen — despite unpredictable weather, fall is a beautiful season.In our busy lives, it can sometimes be hard to fit in some quality time with our children, but the new app Time to Roam may help. The app suggests daily “adventures,” each taking just 15 minutes and covering ideas like recipes or random acts of kindness that you can do as a family. This is helpful if you want to slow down a bit and engage, and it’s free on iOS and Android.The first day of Wall Street’s workweek normally comes with the announcement of a corporate merger or two, hence the nickname “Merger Monday.” But these days, a more appropriate moniker might be “Manic Monday.”There was more than $170 billion of deal-making unveiled on Monday. Dell agreed to acquire EMC, the storage provider, in a deal worth about $67 billion, and Anheuser-Busch InBev said it had raised its bid for SABMiller to about $103 billion. Add in a few smaller transactions and you have one of the biggest days ever in Wall Street deal-making.Mergers and acquisitions are on track for a record year. So far in 2015, there have been nearly $3.5 trillion worth of transactions, according to Thomson Reuters. One Wall Street banker described Monday as feeling “a little bit like 1986 or maybe 2007.”If that’s right, these deals do not portend good things, and will likely represent the end — or at least the beginning of the end — of a bull market.That doesn’t mean the market is going to falter tomorrow, or even in the coming months. If history is any guide, there is likely a year of more deal-making, and with interest rates likely to remain low, it is possible it could go on even longer. When Wall Street banks announce their earnings over the next two weeks, expect talk of an unusually long list of deals in the pipeline. But to many astute financial minds, this level of deal-making is unsustainable.In June, this column pointed out that the latest spate of deal-making was a sign of a weak economy. But these deals may underscore something graver: weak fundamentals.Consider what’s behind Monday’s announcements: businesses that are under siege and trying to transform themselves. In the case of Dell-EMC, Dell is trying to move away from its personal computer business while EMC has been struggling in the face of a changing environment for computer storage. According to my colleague Peter Eavis, Dell’s private numbers reflect a net loss of $768 million, compared with a $570 million loss in the same period a year earlier. Revenue was also down, falling to $27.5 billion in the latest six months, from $29.5 billion in the year-earlier period. The deal may very well work — in fact, it’s probably what both companies should be doing — but the transaction is hardly being struck from a position of strength.The same is true of the possible Anheuser-Busch InBev-SABMiller tie-up. Market share has declined for both companies and sales have fallen in developed countries, where microbrews are stealing significant market share. The rationale for merging is very clear: cost-cutting.Both of these deals may turn out to be good for shareholders, but they both say a lot about what’s driving the current round of mergers and perhaps more important, the larger economic forces at work. Big companies that have been cutting their way to profitability for the last several years have run out of costs to cut. So what do they do? Merge to cut costs even more.“Corporate consolidation can perhaps provide some last drops of stock market intoxication,” Spiros Malandrakis, an analyst at Euromonitor, wrote last month about the potential beer merger.If you were to lay the performance of the S.&P.; 500 over a chart of deal volume over the last 30 years, you’d see that deal-making is a lagging, not a forward-looking, indicator to the stock market. In other words, a rise in deal volume follows a rise in the stock market; it doesn’t come ahead of it. Also, there is often a spike in deal-making in the year and a half before a major market correction. The biggest deals tend to happen at the end of a bull market cycle, like the 2007 leveraged buyout of the Texas utility TXU, which ended with a bankruptcy filing last year. Of course, deals would make more sense at the beginning of a cycle, but chief executives are usually too worried about their own businesses to take a large risk.Dell is certainly taking a big risk, as the deal for EMC will saddle it with $50 billion of debt. Meg Whitman, the chief of Hewlett-Packard, used the transaction’s heavy leverage to take a jab at her rival. “To pay back the interest on the $50 billion of debt that the new combined company will have on their balance sheet, Dell will need to pay roughly $2.5 billion a year in interest alone,” she wrote in a note to her employees. “That’s $2.5 billion that they will allocate away from R.&D.; and other business-critical activities, which will keep them from better serving their customers.”That might be true, but Moody’s is actually planning to upgrade Dell’s debt based on the deal, contending the numbers make sense: “Despite the significant increase in debt and initial leverage, Dell’s overall credit profile will be enhanced with the acquisition of EMC, a merger that will create the largest private technology company in the world based on revenues.”Surely, the Dell-EMC deal and the potential beer combination are far more logical than pie-in-the-sky deals driven by illusory goals or fantastical synergy claims, such as the infamous AOL-Time Warner merger in 1999, widely considered the worst deal ever. We haven’t seen anything that silly — yet.SAN FRANCISCO — Twitter has appointed Omid Kordestani, who until recently was Google’s chief business officer, as its executive chairman.Jack Dorsey, the company’s chief executive and former chairman, announced the choice in a series of Twitter messages on Wednesday morning. “Omid is a proven & experienced leader, who will directly help & coach me and our leadership, and help us recruit the best folks to Twitter,” he wrote.Mr. Kordestani, who has a reputation for affability and business savvy, could bring a level of calm and stability to Twitter, which has been plagued by management chaos during its nine-year history.A company spokesman said Mr. Kordestani was unavailable for an interview but said he would play an active role in operations, supporting the leadership team and helping with recruiting.His appointment is the latest in a series of quick decisions by Mr. Dorsey, who announced Tuesday that Twitter planned to cut up to 8 percent of its work force.Mr. Kordestani was the 11th employee hired at Google. He joined the company in 1999, when it was a year old, and helped create its primary business of selling the ads that appear in Google searches.His original title was “business founder” and he oversaw Google’s first dollar of profit and built its first sales team. That model has since generated hundreds of billions of dollars and still accounts for more than half of Google’s annual revenue.“He was the guy that took Google from, like, no money to real money,” said Wesley Chan, a former Googler who is now a managing director at Felicis Ventures in Palo Alto, Calif.Mr. Kordestani left the company in 2009 but came back last year after his successor, Nikesh Arora, quit to join Softbank. As chief business officer, he was Google’s highest paid executive in 2014, with a $130 million pay package that consisted mostly of stock vesting over four years.In August, Mr. Kordestani left that role when Google reorganized into a technology conglomerate called Alphabet, but remained an adviser until this month.“We’re excited for Omid and very happy for Twitter,” a Google spokeswoman wrote in an email. “Omid was instrumental in establishing Google’s business and helped us develop really close, longstanding partnerships across the industry. We wish him every success in the years ahead.”Twitter has drawn much of its talent from Google, and recently, the flow of people has moved in the other direction, too. The two companies have grown closer in the last year, announcing partnerships to include Twitter messages in Google search results and to allow advertisers to use Google’s DoubleClick to buy ads on Twitter.When Mr. Dorsey was named chief executive of Twitter last week, he and the board promised to find an outside chairman. Mr. Dorsey, a co-founder of Twitter, also said he would seek additional outside candidates for the board, which has been criticized as insular and dominated by company insiders. Dick Costolo, the prior chief executive, left the board on Sept. 30.Mr. Kordestani does not appear to be a regular user of Twitter. Before his appointment, he had sent just eight tweets on his personal account.Some Twitter investors, most notably Chris Sacca, have complained that Twitter has too many board members who “don’t use the product.”The death of a 13-year-old boy who had broadcast much of his life on YouTube prompted an outpouring of grief from his fans, and their curiosity was so intense that his relatives and the authorities were pressed to release further details surrounding how he died.“Due to a large number of inquiries, we can confirm that the juvenile was known as Caleb Logan Bratayley from the popular YouTube episodes ‘Bratayley,’ ” the police in Anne Arundel County, Md., said in a statement about responding to a medical emergency involving the boy on Thursday. The statement also said that the authorities did not suspect foul play in his death, and that the police were no longer investigating.For the authorities, it was a relatively unusual disclosure, but for the 1.7 million people who followed the everyday activities of “Caleb From Bratayley” and his two sisters, on YouTube, it was another update about a family made famous by the edited stylings (and trappings) of vlogger stardom.Caleb’s death came at a time when the Bratayleys were growing a mini social Web empire that hinged on the family being constantly accessible, and they kept the content flowing: On various platforms, the family posted hundreds of videos that often showed three laughing children flipping on trampolines, playing with the family dog, modeling new glasses or rolling around in the yard.Under videos posted on Facebook, fans would congregate to discuss the video or ask for more — “When are you going to post today’s video?” one commenter wrote on Facebook; “can i get a shout out ?????” wrote another. The family was represented by Maker Studios, the digital media company co-owned by Walt Disney. In a statement on Friday, the company said it was “heartbroken at the tragic loss of Caleb from Bratayley,” Reuters reported. The news service also reported that his real name was Caleb LeBlanc.The family’s online following is devoted. In one case, a fan had used YouTube to post a video edited with text and music to mourn Caleb’s death months before he died.After his death, fans posted similar musical tribute videos, but others chose to broadcast their thoughts directly. In the hours following his death, “Bratayley” viewers, many of whom are teenagers, logged on to film themselves and post their reactions. In many cases, the fan videos and comments served as a breeding ground for rumors surrounding the death: In the video below, viewed more than 31,000 times, fans theorized that a hurricane, a heart attack or a panic attack could be the culprit, among other causes.On Monday, a post seeking to dispel some of the questions about his death was sent to some 520,000 followers on the family’s Instagram account, which is managed by his mother, Katie:“Caleb’s death has raised many questions about how and why this could happen to a seemingly healthy boy. Sadly, tests have confirmed today that Caleb passed away from an undetected medical condition.”The outpouring of support, emotion and curiosity has also prompted the family to leave another part of Caleb’s death open to fans: His mother said his memorial service would be broadcast live on Facebook and Periscope on Tuesday evening.SEATTLE — For years, business leaders here have closely studied the San Francisco region, seeking to emulate the way it churns out so many leading technology companies.In large measure, those efforts worked. But now, leaders in Seattle are looking to the Bay Area as a different sort of model: a cautionary tale.The giant sums of money spinning around San Francisco in recent years, fueled by a booming tech sector, have generated hordes of 20-something millionaires and thousands more with six-figure salaries. While that wealth has created a widely envied economy, housing costs have skyrocketed, and the region’s economic divisions have deepened. The median rent for a one-bedroom apartment in San Francisco is $3,530 a month, the highest in the country.People in San Francisco worry the city is losing artists, teachers and its once-vibrant counterculture. The San Francisco Chronicle recently ran a photo essay titled “San Francisco’s Strange Detour From Paradise to Parody.” Across the bay in Oakland, many residents grumbled last month when Uber said it would open a giant new office there.The reaction has reverberated to Seattle and other tech hubs nationwide, prompting leaders to address how to maintain economic diversity and the souls of their cities as their tech economies reshape them. Last year, Seattle became the first major city to approve a $15 minimum-wage law. In addition, the mayor has pushed an ambitious affordable housing plan, and he has committed to expanding the city’s manufacturing and maritime industries.“Seattle has wanted to be San Francisco for so long,” said Knute Berger, a longtime chronicler of life in Seattle. “Now it’s figuring out maybe that it isn’t what we want to be.”While many cities would do almost anything for a deluge of high-tech jobs, others are grappling with the side effects that often accompany surging economies. A plan by Google to expand its presence in Boulder, Colo., with a new campus last year ignited a debate over home prices and traffic. Residents of Portland, Ore., are pointing fingers at people moving from the Bay Area, blaming them for soaring home prices.And in Austin, Tex., whose official motto is “live music capital of the world,” a charity called Black Fret is awarding grants to musicians struggling with the rising cost of living in the city. Matt Ott, a marketing executive at a tech start-up in Austin, who co-founded Black Fret, left the Bay Area about a decade ago because it got so expensive.“It got really tiring to have wealth and consumption be the topic of the day,” he said. “I think that is a real danger here.”Nowhere, though, has there been a more concerted effort to create a San Francisco-like tech scene with fewer downsides than in Seattle, the country’s second-biggest tech hub by some measures.Beyond Amazon and Microsoft, Seattle’s tech scene in the last 10 years has come to include dozens of smaller tech companies as well as engineering offices for Facebook, Google and other Bay Area tech giants. The number of technology-related jobs in King County, which includes Seattle and neighboring cities, jumped to almost 138,000 this year, from about 88,000 in 2005, according to Community Attributes, a research firm, and the Washington Technology Industry Association.By far, the most significant changes in Seattle’s landscape have been created by Amazon. The company, known for its intense work culture, has transformed a once-industrial neighborhood near Lake Union into a hive of tech workers wearing blue company security badges.While the city’s mayor, Ed Murray, praises Amazon, he has also said he wants to keep the working-class roots of Seattle, a city with a major port, fishing fleet and even a steel mill. After taking office last year, he made the minimum-wage increase a priority and reassured representatives of the city’s manufacturing and maritime industries that Seattle needed them.“It’s not true that a strong technology sector in Seattle means the demise of manufacturing,” Mr. Murray said in a speech last year.A rising economy often leads to rising living costs, and to help slow the increase, Mr. Murray has pushed housing construction. He has set a goal of creating 50,000 homes — 40 percent of them affordable for low-income residents — over the next decade.“We can hopefully create enough affordable housing so we don’t find ourselves as skewed by who lives in the city as San Francisco is,” Mr. Murray said.The plan is something of a repudiation of the policies in San Francisco, which has a notoriously complex building approval process, and where efforts to construct high-density housing often encounter ferocious resistance from neighbors.The debate over affordable housing in San Francisco has intensified in the last few years as the tech frenzy migrated to the city, once a backwater for start-ups, from Silicon Valley. Corporate buses that shuttle San Francisco-dwelling employees down the peninsula have been the targets of activists protesting gentrification.San Francisco is not ignoring its problems. The city’s mayor, Edwin M. Lee, is pushing a plan to let developers construct taller buildings if they designate at least 30 percent of them affordable for low- and moderate-income households, with the goal of creating 10,000 such units over the next five years.And the San Francisco area remains a strong magnet for the tech-inclined.“At an individual level, I wish Seattle were more like S.F., simply because it’s way easier to find interesting work in S.F.” for tech engineers, said John Rauser, who had worked in San Francisco for Pinterest, a digital scrapbooking site. He recently moved to Seattle, thinking it would be easier to raise a family.Yet Alan Durning, a member of the committee that put together Seattle’s housing plan, said that the Bay Area’s affordable housing crisis was a central part of the group’s discussions, and that the area embodied the kind of situation most members desperately wanted to avoid.“It’s not that we don’t want to be a thriving tech center — we do,” Mr. Durning said. “It’s that the San Francisco and Silicon Valley communities have gotten themselves into a trap where preservationists and local politics have basically guaranteed buying a house will cost at least $1 million. Already in Seattle, it costs half-a-million, so we’re well on our way.”Last year, Seattle had a net addition of more than 7,500 homes, a record for the city, compared with just over 3,500 in San Francisco, according to planning departments in both cities. Seattle partly benefits from having a larger area and about 185,000 fewer residents than San Francisco.Much of the building boom here so far has been for apartments with high rents, geared toward tech workers. The city’s vibrant Capitol Hill neighborhood has been a point of contention, with some residents being priced out of the area. The streets and freeways are increasingly choked with traffic, and locals often denounce the public transportation options.John Criscitello, an artist, has pasted posters throughout Capitol Hill protesting the changes brought by the newcomers. “Welcome! Rich Kids,” one poster reads, while another declares, “Wish you weren’t here.”Those feelings have been expressed in places like Portland as well, where a two-bedroom house is half the price of a studio apartment in San Francisco.Redfin, the online real estate brokerage firm, said the percentage of Bay Area residents who used the site to buy homes in Portland more than tripled to 12.6 percent during the first seven months of this year compared with last year. Last month in Portland, someone slapped stickers showing the state of California with a slash through it on for-sale signs outside homes.Seattle is aiming for something more like a middle ground. The mayor’s housing proposals are being considered in pieces by the City Council. Already he has had to backtrack on an element that would have allowed high-density housing in nearly all areas zoned for single-family homes.Roger Valdez, director of Smart Growth Seattle, a group that advocates high-density housing and is supported by developers, has been disappointed at the resistance to more development in the city.“We’re at a crossroads,” he said. “One path leads to San Francisco, where you have an incredibly regulated and stagnant housing economy that can’t keep up with demand. The other path is something different, the Seattle way.”The first thing you notice when hanging around technology start-ups is the cultural importance that Silicon Valley ascribes to snacking, with a company’s snack bar often standing as a rough proxy for the scope of its ambitions.Square, Jack Dorsey’s payments business, boasts a gleaming coffee bar with a barista who hosts classes on the best ways to brew. On one trip to Facebook, I was treated to an otherworldly bag of popcorn. And just about every company has a refrigerator or two stocked with Hint, a subtly flavored brand of bottled water that seems to flow as freely in San Francisco as the tears of the people who were evicted to make room for the incoming software engineers.Even when a start-up’s dreams are deferred, the snacks hang on, as I learned during a recent visit to the buses that were once owned by Leap Transit, a start-up that once had aspirations of revolutionizing urban transportation.Leap, which raised $2.5 million from some of the industry’s best-known investors, charged riders $6 to get across San Francisco, nearly three times the price of a city bus. Its primary draw was luxury. Each bus had a wood-trimmed interior outfitted with black leather seats, individual USB ports and Wi-Fi. The buses also offered a steady stream of gourmet snacks, sold via app.I’d come to the see the buses to find out what it looks like when a start-up bites the dust. The luxury vehicles were up for auction; Leap filed for bankruptcy in July. The end for Leap apparently came so suddenly that its founders didn’t have time to remove much from the vehicles. Inside each bus sitting in an out-of-the-way parking lot near Oakland, Calif., was a state registration form pinned to the wall, a bundle of iPhone and HDMI cables, and a display case full of snacks. Among the choices were packages of That’s It — vegan, gluten-free, non-GMO fruit bars — and organic, paleo Simple Squares.Leap is one of at least several dozen tech companies that have failed this year. Their deaths are illuminating; dead start-ups show us which investors’ theories are bogus, which technologies aren’t ready for prime time, and which common ways founders overextend themselves. They also outline the frontiers of what the current market for tech products and services will bear.In particular, Leap’s death suggests one emerging cause of start-up doom, a problem that also did in the anonymous social-network Secret: too-close an association with Silicon Valley’s tech-bro sensibilities.Leap, in retrospect, was a bold idea that might have had legs. Muni, San Francisco’s public bus system, is overloaded and underfunded, and the success of ride-hailing apps like Uber suggests a public willingness to try new tech-enabled options. But in its design and marketing — in its full-frontal embrace of the easily pilloried paleo-snack-bar techie lifestyle — Leap exuded a kind of bourgeoisie exceptionalism that fed into the city’s fears of gentrification and won it few fans. As I stood inside the abandoned buses, it became obvious why the start-up failed: Leap was created by and for tech bros. It was born inside the bubble, and it could never escape.Tech deaths often go unstudied. Silicon Valley stands out for the way it embraces failure, and it’s true that the “We Failed!” start-up post-mortem note has become a staple on publishing sites like Medium. Still, there’s a natural disinclination among entrepreneurs and investors to discuss the deaths of their companies in much depth. Kyle Kirchhoff, the co-founder and chief executive of Leap, was among several founders of dead companies who did not respond to my requests for interviews.Thanks to such reluctance, no one quite knows how many tech start-ups are dying, or why. “There’s a lot of fanfare when companies get funded or acquired, but people bury the dead pretty quietly,” said Anand Sanwal, the chief executive of CB Insights, a firm that keeps stats on the start-up market. He added that the task is complicated by the fact that many failed start-ups don’t actually die — they limp along for years, underperforming.Mr. Sanwal estimated that the number of start-up failures increased in 2015, but he believed the uptick was most likely because many more companies were founded and funded a few years ago, as the tech market began heating up. “There were companies that went in at the top of the funnel, so a lot more of them are meeting that fate,” he said.Leap’s troubles started early. It began a private bus service in San Francisco in 2013. Even though it had no valid city or state license, the company decided to use city bus stops to pick up and drop off passengers — a practice that earned it immediate scorn from city officials and cast the service as part of the tech-versus-everyone-else narrative of gentrification in San Francisco. The company went on hiatus in 2014 while its founders worked with state and city officials to win a preliminary certificate to operate. Among the stipulations was that Leap refrain from using city bus stops.When Leap began operating again in March, the company struck a sour note in the news media, embracing so many techie stereotypes you could be forgiven for thinking it was cooked up by the writers of HBO’s “Silicon Valley.”In an interview with TechCrunch, Mr. Kirchhoff called the buses “a blend between a coffee shop, a workspace and something that feels like your living room.” He demonstrated, for a reporter from The Verge, how riders could order organic juice. As Katie Dowd, a writer for SFGate.com, noted: “Predictably but hilariously, there is no one who appears to be over the age of 35 in any of the publicity photos or video. Muni is for old people, obviously.” Making matters worse, the San Francisco Chronicle reported that Leap had removed wheelchair accessibility ramps from its buses to make room for “plush leather armchairs.”In May, two months after Leap began operating, the California Public Utilities Commission sent the company a cease-and-desist letter because the company had started offering service before finalizing the conditions of its original approval notice. On its Facebook page, Leap promised to take a short break while it worked through the issues. It has been dormant ever since.By the time of its bankruptcy auction earlier this month, which attracted only a handful of bidders, Leap was all but forgotten. In its bankruptcy filing, Leap reported that it made nearly $21,000 in the two months during which it offered service. That turned out to be less than two of its buses — which officials told me could no longer start — fetched at auction: One sold for $11,100, and another for $12,100. The buyers were anonymous.Could Leap have fared better if it had a taken a less outwardly oppositional stance in its conduct and its branding? It seems likely that would have helped. The company had entered the thicket of San Francisco regulatory and civic debate without spending much time to win over fans in the community. Its on-board aesthetics and services lit up every gentrification warning sign, such that, from the start, Leap seemed designed only for those people — the tech people who give everyone else a bad name.Some companies can escape their image. Uber, a company whose endless run-ins with authorities have covered its brand in an ethical haze, is still experiencing growth because the product remains truly useful to riders and drivers. But the winners are the exceptions. Most companies can’t repeat unlikely success. Leap tried. Despite the snacks, it failed.DUBLIN — The Irish government, long criticized by other European countries and the United States for its friendly tax treatment of multinational giants like Apple and Google, on Tuesday announced a move that seemed likely to further incense its critics.Ireland, whose corporate tax rate of 12.5 percent is already one of the lowest in the developed world, said it would cut that rate in half for a new tax category — one covering revenue pegged to companies’ patents and other intellectual property.Companies that could be poised to benefit include Apple, Google, Facebook and Microsoft — all of which have significant operations in Ireland and have troves of intellectual property that might be eligible for the new tax treatment.Google and Facebook declined to comment on Tuesday, and Apple and Microsoft did not immediately respond to requests for comment.The new 6.25 percent rate would apply to a tax category that Ireland announced last year, which it calls a “knowledge development box,” and would be put into effect early next year. The category is meant to provide tax breaks for revenue and royalties derived from intellectual property held in a specific country.Other countries, including Britain, Luxembourg and the Netherlands, have created similar tax categories for intellectual property, often in the hope of enticing overseas companies to set up shop in their territories.But critics contend that the royalties paid on intellectual property under such arrangements often do not adequately reflect where the inventions were made or where the innovations generate the most revenue.Finance Minister Michael Noonan of Ireland, who announced the new plan on Tuesday, described the knowledge box and the low rate as a “significant enhancement” to Ireland’s corporate tax system.“This puts Ireland in the unique position to offer long-term certainty to industries planning their research and development investments,” he said. “The initiative adds a further dimension to our best-in-class corporation tax offerings.”James Stewart, an associate professor of finance at Trinity College, Dublin, said Ireland’s new approach would probably change the tax strategies of multinational companies — though not for the better.“This is complex, and multinationals love complexity,” he said, “because it allows them to develop tax avoidance strategies. The last thing they want is simplicity.”Over the last two decades, many American companies — tech giants like Facebook and Google, as well as nontech companies like the drugmaker Pfizer — have established sizable operations in Ireland, primarily to take advantage of the country’s low-tax tradition.Ireland’s corporate tax rates compare with a rate of 35 percent, before deductions, in the United States.But critics say the bigger issue lies in the special tax deals that Ireland made to entice multinational companies to set up operations there. Such deals have led to criticism from some global policy makers, who argue that companies are not paying enough tax.Ireland is by no means the only European country whose corporate tax strategies have come under scrutiny. The European Union has been investigating the tax arrangements between big multinational companies in Luxembourg and the Netherlands, among other places.For many lawmakers and regulators in the 28-nation European Union, particularly in the countries severely affected by the financial crisis, the ability of some companies to move a large share of their European revenue to low-tax member states like Ireland has been viewed as unfair competition and as an encouragement of tax-shopping by multinational corporations.As part of the region’s efforts to increase transparency over where companies pay tax, European officials agreed last week to force individual countries to provide information on preferential tax deals granted to international companies.Ireland’s new rules are meant to comply with that agreement while going even further, Mr. Noonan indicated. He said Ireland was becoming one of the first countries to adopt tax-disclosure and compliance guidelines detailed by the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, which represents 34 industrialized democracies.The idea, the Irish government said, is to let its tax officials have a fuller picture of companies that use Ireland as a tax base, to determine whether they are paying their share of corporate taxes in other jurisdictions. Ireland said it would share this confidential information with other countries where the companies operate.In adopting the new knowledge-box category, Ireland says it is trying to eliminate complicated tax structures that have included the so-called “Double Irish” tax provision. That provision, now being phased out, allowed companies with operations in Ireland to make royalty payments for intellectual property to a separate Irish-registered subsidiary. That unit, though incorporated in Ireland, typically had its home in a country that had no corporate income tax, reducing the amount each company had to pay on its Irish-based profits.Eamonn Walsh, an accounting professor at University College, Dublin, said the new approach by Ireland “should end some of the more egregious attempts to channel funds to zero-rate jurisdictions.”“Companies might decide to cut their losses,” he said, “and opt for the certainty of a 6.5 percent rate in Ireland.”Tax officials in the United States have criticized Ireland’s arrangements. But the issue is particularly sensitive in Europe, where many countries are still struggling. Tax experts say national governments are eager to tap into new sources of income, especially as many of the large American tech companies have continued to post record profits despite the recent global economic uncertainty.In countries including France, which is perceived by some industry executives as taking a harsh line against American tech companies, politicians have called on companies like Google to pay taxes on their local operations, instead of only in Ireland, where the company has its European headquarters.In response, tech companies typically say that they conform with the tax laws in every country where they operate.Yet, in a sign that some national lawmakers are starting to clamp down on companies’ often-complicated tax structures, countries are changing their local regulations to force companies to pay more tax.In Britain, for example, politicians recently passed a so-called Google Tax that requires companies to pay a certain level of tax on their operations there, even though their headquarters are elsewhere for tax purposes.And in May, Amazon, the e-commerce giant, announced that it would pay taxes in a number of European countries where it has large operations, instead of funneling nearly all of its sales through Luxembourg, which has comparatively low taxes.United States congressional investigators said in 2013 that Apple had created a web of international subsidiaries, some in Ireland, to move at least $74 billion from 2009 to 2012 beyond the reach of the Internal Revenue Service. Apple has denied wrongdoing and says that it pays appropriate levels of tax in the countries where it operates.The European Commission, the executive arm of the European Union, has been investigating whether the Irish government gave Apple illegal subsidies through a preferential tax settlement.The investigators, who are still conducting their inquiries, criticized Irish officials for giving Apple unlawful so-called state aid in the form of tax breaks. Such special deals, according to a 21-page report published last year, created unfair advantages for Ireland over other European countries. The Irish government may eventually be forced to collect back taxes from Apple.A separate investigation is looking at whether Luxembourg broke Europe’s tough state-aid rules by offering similar preferential treatment to Amazon, whose European headquarters are there.Yet while European Union officials have applauded these efforts, lawmakers in some countries, particularly those that have used low corporate taxes to entice global companies to their shores, have complained that they will not be able to compete against bigger countries if they cannot use tax incentives to attract new investment from international businesses.Ireland’s corporate tax rates may be low by international standards, but the revenue they generate is a major contributor to the country’s Treasury. In 2014, Ireland’s total tax take was 41 billion euros, or $46.6 billion, and corporate tax accounted for 11 percent of the total.SAN FRANCISCO —  Despite the billions of “likes” bestowed on Facebook posts every month, something has been missing: an option to express a different emotion.On Thursday, Facebook announced it will begin testing six new emotional reactions that you can convey with a simple emoji, similar to the thumbs-up “like” icon that the social networking service has made so famous.The six new emoji depict various expressions, from an open mouth to express surprise to a scowling red face for anger. The other four emotions are love, laughter, sadness and a supportive cheer.The new reaction icons will be available to most Facebook users in Spain and Ireland by the end of this week. Adam Mosseri, who oversees Facebook’s news feed, said the company would evaluate how people in those two countries use the new buttons and refine them, before expanding the rollout to the company’s 1.5 billion users worldwide later this year.“How do people use it? Is this the right set of reactions?” Mr. Mosseri said in an interview.Mark E. Zuckerberg, Facebook’s co-founder and chief executive, said last month that the company planned to test a way to “dislike” a post. “I do think it’s important to give people more options than just like,” he said at that time.While none of the new buttons are labeled that way, the angry and sad faces are designed to express negative emotions in a sympathetic way.Almost since the arrival of the like button, Facebook users have been asking for a dislike button or another quick way to express an opinion about a post beyond simply liking it. As more and more Facebook usage shifted to mobile phones, where typing comments is more difficult, it increased pressure on the company to introduce other reaction buttons.Mr. Mosseri said that Facebook chose which emotions to add by looking at which virtual stickers people used most frequently in comments on posts.And it was also important to pick emotions and emoji that translated well globally. “We tried the find the ones that are most universally used,” he said.Philip writes: When I am driving and I receive a text, instead of replying myself, my wife will text for me. But if I say: ‘‘Should we meet you at your house?’’ she will send ‘‘should wee meet u at ur house.’’ I find texting impersonal, but if I am forced to text, I at least want to use appropriate English. Please order her to type my words properly when texting under my name.Your wife = thumbs down emoji. Unless she IDs herself as your wife — in which case, fine. But also, maybe, ambulance emoji? B/c betcha friends figured out how to meet at house emoji b4 cellphone emoji existed w/o risk of skull emoji while driving. Even with your wife txting, most questions can wait. This is the emoji of a gavel. That is all.A couple of weeks ago, two of my New York Times colleagues chronicled digital culture trends that are so newish and niche-y that conventional English dictionaries don’t yet include words for either of them.In an article on Sept. 20, Stephanie Rosenbloom, a travel columnist, reviewed flight apps that try to perfect “farecasting” — that is, she explained, the art of “predicting the best date to buy a ticket” to obtain the lowest fares.That same day Jenna Wortham, a columnist for The Times Magazine, described a phenomenon she called “technomysticism,” in which Internet users embrace medieval beliefs, spells and charms.These word coinages may be too fresh — and too little used for now — to be of immediate interest to major English dictionaries. But Erin McKean, a lexicographer with an egalitarian approach to language, thinks “madeupical” words such as these deserve to be documented.Ms. McKean started a campaign last month on Kickstarter, the crowdfunding site, to unearth one million “missing” English words — words that are not currently found in traditional dictionaries. To locate the underdocumented expressions, she has engaged a pair of data scientists to scrape and analyze language used in online publications. Ms. McKean said she planned to incorporate the found words in Wordnik.com, an online dictionary of which she is a co-founder.“We really believe that every word should be lookupable,” Ms. McKean told me recently. “That doesn’t mean that every word should be used in every situation. But we think that people by and large are entirely capable of making that decision for themselves.”Before her analytics project gets underway next month, Ms. McKean is crowdsourcing a list of missing words for possible inclusion in Wordnik. Candidates so far include: procrastatweeting, dronevertising and roomnesia, a condition in which people forget why they walked into a room.Ms. McKean, who is a former editor of the New Oxford American Dictionary, and two colleagues introduced the Wordnik site in 2009 with the aim of addressing some limitations they had encountered while working for dictionary publishers.Traditional print dictionaries employ lexicographers to track and assess words, selecting the worthiest candidates to be included in published editions. But printed lexicons naturally have limited space. And with only periodic updates, they are not intended to keep pace with contemporary spoken language.In a recent quarterly online update, the Oxford English Dictionary added the word “hoverboard” — 26 years after the floating skateboards were first mentioned in the movie “Back to the Future II.” An editor’s note explained that the O.E.D. had decided to add “hoverboard” now because the dictionary’s word-monitoring system had recently detected an increased use of the term, most likely, the note says, related to a 2015 date that is an important plot element in the film.(It doesn’t always take decades to document a new word. The O.E.D. added “podcast” in 2008 just four years after it says the word emerged.)With no space limitations or publication deadlines, Wordnik is able to incorporate a vast number of new words on a continuing basis. In addition to human contributors, the site uses automated online searches to locate sentences that contain certain words on blogs, social media, news and other sites.When a person looks up a term on Wordnik, the site displays full-sentence examples of its usage, taken from sources like The Huffington Post and Boing Boing. If the word already has an entry in certain more traditional dictionaries, the site also provides that definition.Ms. McKean said Wordnik had accumulated some information on eight million words, both old and new. Its inclusive approach makes the site more of a word welcomer than a winnower.“The question is no longer, ‘Is this a good word?’ ” Ms. McKean said. “The question is: ‘What is this word good for? Is this word good for what I need?’ ”She now plans to expand Wordnik’s word-acquisition system by turning to data analytics to pinpoint emerging terms, like farecasting, that writers explained in passing when they mentioned them. Ms. McKean refers to these readily available explanations as “free-range definitions.” They are easy to locate, she said, because writers often use stock phrases, like “also known as” or “scientists term this” to signal to their readers that they’re about to introduce a new or unfamiliar term.To cast a wider net for her project, Ms. McKean has enlisted Summer.ai, a data analytics firm. The company plans to use computational techniques to analyze online publications for language structure and patterns — like quotation marks and dashes — that are likely to indicate new words accompanied by self-contained definitions.Some lexicographers already track whether words are nearing the end of their useful life spans. But Manuel Ebert, a former neuroscientist who is the co-founder of Summer.ai, said the Wordnik research might help track the speed of new-word adoption.“We can actually measure when words get adopted in mainstream lingo,” he said, by looking at when writers stop explaining neologisms like “infotainment” and start using them as if their meanings were commonly understood. “It will be interesting to see which words will very quickly get adopted and which words remain outsiders.”Researchers like Paul Cook, an assistant professor of computer science at the University of New Brunswick in Canada, are using similar techniques to find other kinds of novel words.Mr. Cook developed a program several years ago to analyze posts on Twitter that included new lexical blends — like “jeggings,” a combination of jeans and leggings — and their definitions. Among other portmanteau words, his Twitter research turned up “awksome” (awkward plus awesome) and “hilazing” (hilarious plus amazing). He hopes eventually to use his program to generate a blended-word lexicon.“We could have some sort of automatically generated blend dictionary,” Mr. Cook said. “If you had information like this, some dictionaries might be interested in providing this kind of information, as opposed to none.”This more-words-the-merrier approach is one that lexicographers like Ms. McKean favor.“Every new word added to the expressiveness of English adds to the things that it’s possible to say,” she says. “English already has one of the world’s largest installed user bases. So why wouldn’t we want to add to it?”Not long ago, Larry Page watched the Disney film “Tomorrowland.” He didn’t like it.Mr. Page, the co-founder of Google and the chief executive of its parent company, Alphabet, told shareholders in June that he wanted to see a positive depiction of technological advances, which is rare in the movies. But while Mr. Page is an optimist’s optimist, like many critics he thought “Tomorrowland” was a little too utopian. He’d hit on a central problem with attempts to imagine the future in the sunny way that many in Silicon Valley see it: A perfect future makes for a boring story.“Steve Jobs,” the director Danny Boyle’s new biopic about the late Apple impresario, aims to get around that problem. The film, which stars Michael Fassbender as Mr. Jobs, is nominally a story about a tech visionary who is unpleasant to just about everyone around him. Yet surprisingly, “Steve Jobs” ends up presenting Mr. Jobs in a positive light, partly because it accepts that his products did change the world for the better, in just the ways he’d promised they would.“Steve Jobs” will be seen by many as an attack on Mr. Jobs — his family and his former colleagues have harshly criticized it — but that is just half the story. The film ultimately suggests that the deeply unpleasant behavior of people in the tech industry may be worth putting up with because of what they sometimes manage to create, often in spite of themselves. It is one of the few pop cultural depictions of the tech industry to buy into Silicon Valley’s essential worldview: an aggressive optimism that is willing to roll over just about everything and everyone in its path in the service of what it sees as the more important goal of building tomorrow.The film, which opens in limited release this weekend and more widely on Oct. 23, is the most sophisticated take yet in a growing body of movies, TV shows, novels and other cultural takes on Silicon Valley. Based on a screenplay by Aaron Sorkin that is loosely adapted from Walter Isaacson’s authorized biography of Mr. Jobs, this is the third major film about the Apple co-founder since his death in 2011. There was also “Jobs,” the 2013 movie starring Ashton Kutcher, and, this year, “Steve Jobs: The Man in the Machine,” the documentarian Alex Gibney’s critical take on Mr. Jobs.Beyond Apple, there’s “Silicon Valley,” the HBO comedy about the travails of a start-up, and “Halt and Catch Fire,” the AMC drama about the brutal personal computer business of the 1980s. Then there was “The Social Network,” the 2010 film on the history of Facebook, which Mr. Sorkin also wrote. Even stories not nominally about the industry feature cameos by tech billionaires, who have become easy stand-ins for the powerful forces unleashed by technology — see “Book of Numbers,” the recent acclaimed novel by Joshua Cohen, or the Google-like founder who’s the chief villain in the film “Ex Machina.”It’s easy to explain the bumper crop of pop-cultural takes on the tech industry. Like finance in the 1980s, technology has lately become not just a source of widespread economic angst, but one of social and cultural angst. And a small class of tech founders have become the most powerful figures of our time. Techies are the “New Establishment,” as Vanity Fair calls them. The magazine even hosts an annual conference devoted to the emerging group of titans who seem certain to one day preside over every aspect of how we buy, watch, read, chat, eat, sleep, dream — if they don’t already.And if the recent movies and TV shows about the tech industry are anywhere near accurate, we are all in for a heap of trouble. The tech founders who will rule our future are shown as hapless and comically myopic, inspired either by a desire for world domination or by petty efforts to relieve their social anxieties.What is unusual about “Steve Jobs” is its search for a more authentic motivation for the villainies that we associate with tech billionaires like the Apple co-founder. “Steve Jobs” is not very kind to Steve Jobs. He is presented as a man who spent years denying paternity of his daughter and who later only grudgingly paid for her support. At every turn, he treats employees and colleagues as expendable cogs in his corporate game, often without understanding the damage he inflicts on those around him.Yet unlike many across the business world, the Steve Jobs in this film is not motivated mainly by ego and greed. Instead, what really gets him going is an insatiable desire to “put a dent in the universe,” as Mr. Jobs often put it. Silicon Valley’s insistence on changing the world is usually pilloried in the news media. But here, Mr. Jobs’s mission is accorded respect — and his behavior, the film implies, can be ultimately tolerated because of what he built.Part of the film’s success in this regard rests on Mr. Sorkin’s decision to set the story on the development of the personal computer, a technology whose eventual importance is no longer a matter of dispute. Mr. Jobs’s other great product, the touch-screen smartphone, may one day prove more thoroughly world-changing, but at the moment, it raises almost as many fears as it does hopes, and the film wisely stays away from it.The personal computer, though — who could argue that it hasn’t proved groundbreaking? To show Mr. Jobs’s ability to see the future, Mr. Sorkin quotes Mr. Jobs’s best argument for the personal computer almost word for word. Humanity’s greatest strength, Mr. Jobs once noted, is that we’re tool builders. A condor is the most mechanically efficient animal on the planet, but a human being on a bicycle blows the condor away.“What a computer is to me is, it’s the most remarkable tool that we’ve ever come up with,” Mr. Jobs said. “It’s the equivalent of a bicycle for our minds.”The ultimate importance of the personal computer hangs over every conflict in the film. When Mr. Jobs harangues his staff, when he puts the company ahead of his supposed friends, when he shows little regard for his family in the service of building what’s next, he implicitly holds an ace with the audience who know how things eventually turned out. Sure, he may have been terrible to be around, but in the end, wasn’t he right about the importance of that dent in the universe? And if he hadn’t been as obnoxious about his aims, would the dent have been as large?During an argument late in the movie, Steve Wozniak, Apple’s co-founder, who, like everyone else, often clashed with Mr. Jobs, tells him: “Your products are better than you are, brother.”“That’s the idea,” Mr. Jobs responds. The tech industry may be peopled by many petty, ruthless, self-important weirdos. But look at the products, not the people. In the future, only the products will matter.Jack Dorsey’s appointment as permanent chief executive of Twitter leaves the other company he runs, Square, in a thorny situation.On Monday, Mr. Dorsey, 38, was named Twitter’s chief while remaining in charge of Square, a payments start-up. That means he will divide his time between Twitter and Square, just as Square is preparing  for an initial public offering that could come before the end of the year.A Square spokesman, Aaron Zamost, declined to comment on whether the company planned to file for an I.P.O.It is a difficult moment for Mr. Dorsey, who considers both companies to be his children, according to three people close to him. But the situation is even trickier for the employees of Square. Some of them are concerned about how Mr. Dorsey’s split attention will be received, according to more than a dozen current and former employees of Square and Twitter. Some said it seemed as if Mr. Dorsey was choosing his favorite child, Twitter, over the second-born, Square.Mr. Dorsey sought to quell Square employee concerns in June at a town-hall-style meeting in the start-up’s airy San Francisco headquarters. He told the gathering that he would not step down as chief executive of the company, which he co-founded five years ago, until he was “old or dead.”But confusion among Square’s rank and file has persisted. In late August, when a Square employee asked Mr. Dorsey on an internal company forum if he was also going to be permanent chief of Twitter — the social networking company that Mr. Dorsey had co-founded and where he was interim leader — he could not give a straight answer, according to people who saw the exchange and asked not to be named because the details were private.How Mr. Dorsey’s dual chief executive positions look to investors just as Square prepares to go public will also be a question mark. Taking a company public requires constant communication with regulators, as well as a breakneck pace of meetings with potential shareholders, and Mr. Dorsey risks losing some investors who might otherwise have participated in the offering.Square may need to accept a lower price as a consolation to investors who are worried about his ability to spend the time necessary to maximize value for shareholders, said several Wall Street money managers.“The market would assign a discount associated with him being head of two companies,” said Michael Scanlon, a portfolio manager at John Hancock Asset Management, who oversees $4.5 billion in assets. “It poses a challenge to him, in terms of management, with two companies that are in different life cycles of their business.”Mr. Zamost, head of communications at Square, said in a statement that Mr. Dorsey remained devoted to the company. “Jack has never wavered from his commitment to leading Square as C.E.O.,” he said.Square filed confidentially for its I.P.O. this year and it is unclear when the company will make the filing public. Advisers and underwriters are closely watching the volatility of the public markets and the direction of interest rates, according to people involved in the process. If conditions are not optimal, these people said, Square may delay an offering for the near term.Square already faces plenty of detractors. Founded in 2009, the company offers credit card processing for small and midsize businesses, and has expanded into other subscription services like employee payroll and scheduling. It has raised more than half a billion dollars in venture capital; at the time of its last fund-raising in 2014, it was privately valued at $6 billion by investors.Yet the company has repeatedly dealt with reports in the last few years that questioned its viability and business because of what some industry watchers consider its small margins. Square takes a 2.75 percent cut of most transactions, but must hand some of that over to credit card networks and other intermediaries.Insiders who have worked at Square say Mr. Dorsey has divided his time well among projects at the company that he deemed as needing the most attention — those currently being Square Capital, the company’s cash advance program; Square Cash, a peer-to-peer payments app; and a new card and contactless payment reader. He also delegates responsibilities where his product expertise and vision are not needed.“I’ve seen this before, once a team is superstrong and operating well, Jack moves on to the next thing,” said one Square director, who has been at the company since its early days. “It’s not realistic for him to be around all the time on every single project.”Insiders also cite Square’s executive leadership, many of whose members hail from Google, Facebook, Amazon and Salesforce, as a strong team that can support Mr. Dorsey on day-to-day operations as he runs both Square and Twitter.Some specifically point to Francoise Brougher, Square’s business lead and a former Google advertising executive, and Sarah Friar, the chief financial officer, who has a background in financial analysis at Goldman Sachs and McKinsey. As C.F.O., Ms. Friar will play a large supporting role to Mr. Dorsey in an initial public offering.Mr. Dorsey is not the first chief executive to encounter the challenge of being in multiple jobs when one company heads to an I.P.O. When Elon Musk took Tesla public in 2010, he was also chief executive of SpaceX, the rocket company, and chairman of SolarCity, a solar-equipment installation company.Tesla, the electric-car company, listed Mr. Musk’s inability to devote “full time and attention” to the company among the risk factors in the I.P.O. prospectus. The offering did not suffer — instead, based on greater-than-expected demand, Tesla priced its shares above the marketed price range and they surged more than 40 percent on Day 1.Mr. Zamost, Square’s spokesman, said in a statement that Mr. Dorsey’s multiple roles would not hurt that company, either. “Jack has built a deep bench of talented senior executives,” he said, and “he has shown for the past several months he has the ability, passion and commitment to lead both companies effectively.”Drunken drivers are often caught weaving down a street in their cars or running stop signs. But the police in a Florida town have found a new way to track down a suspected drunken driver.The police in Lakeland, Fla., said in a statement that 911 dispatchers started receiving calls Saturday from viewers who were watching a woman broadcasting herself while apparently driving drunk, using the live-streaming app Periscope.Despite the tip being generated in the virtual world, it took some traditional police sleuthing to find the woman and, ultimately, arrest and charge her.The woman, identified by the police as Whitney Marie Beall, 23, first invited her viewers to follow her as she went bar-hopping in downtown Lakeland, according to reports.At first, the police statement said, after she got behind the wheel, two viewers sent her text messages, telling her to pull over before she killed herself or someone else.One caller who was watching told the police that the woman was driving in the north Lakeland area. As he watched, according to the police statement, she said she was drunk and lost and had a flat tire, but the video feed was sporadic and the caller was unable to tell the police exactly what type of vehicle the woman was driving.During the live stream, published by WFTV in Orlando, Fla., Ms. Beall repeatedly said that she was drunk and appeared to be asking viewers for directions. She noticed that there were at least 57 people watching and asked, “So where am I right now, people?”Officers in Lakeland are not provided with access to Periscope through the department, the police statement said. But one officer had a personal account, which officers used to scrutinize the landscape, picking out landmarks to pin down where she was: a street called Carpenters Way.As officers pulled her over, her 2015 Toyota Corolla, which already had a flat right front tire, rammed into a curb. She failed a roadside sobriety test and was charged with drunken driving, the police statement said.The Florida news television channel WFLA in the Tampa Bay region said that it tracked down Ms. Beall at her home, but she did not want to comment.“She hung her head down and said this was a big mistake. And she is learning a lesson from it all,” said the station’s reporter, Holly Bounds.Ms. Beall’s lawyer, Lee Cohen, said in a statement that he would enter a plea of not guilty on her behalf, the station reported.Jack Dorsey is tightening Twitter’s belt.Just days after being named permanent chief executive of Twitter, Mr. Dorsey is planning a series of cost-cutting maneuvers at the social networking company, including layoffs and halting a plan to expand the company’s San Francisco’s headquarters, according to three people familiar with the plans, who spoke on the condition of anonymity because the details are private.The plans are part of an effort to trim what many insiders see as an organization that has grown bloated — Twitter has over 4,100 employees in more than 35 offices — over the past few years, these people said.A Twitter spokesman declined to comment.The moves, with the layoffs set to come as soon as Tuesday, signal swift action by Mr. Dorsey, who was named permanent chief only on Monday. Mr. Dorsey, 38, who also co-founded Twitter, had held the interim chief title since July 1 and has had time to assess the company’s prospects, strengths and weaknesses.He returned to a company in crisis. While Twitter went public in 2013 in a wave of hype, its stock price has more recently fallen — at one point dropping below its $26 initial public offering price — as the company has struggled to attract new users. Twitter faces intense competition for consumer attention from rivals like Instagram, Snapchat and WhatsApp, threatening its ability to attract new advertising dollars.“Twitter is clearly going through a transition, a new C.E.O., new products, and this restructuring is another avenue they will need to go down,” said Brian Blau, a technology analyst at Gartner. “Reducing costs by reductions is always tough, but a better focus on execution and innovation will help them in the long run.”Moving quickly once in the executive suite is a well-worn tactic by founder chief executives who return to their company after a stint away. Earlier this year, Mark Pincus, founder of Zynga, also came back as chief executive of the games company after a period out of the day-to-day operations. Soon thereafter, he cut staff by 18 percent and exited several nonessential businesses.At Twitter, many of the cost-cutting measures came into focus during a recent planning process for 2016, according to two people familiar with the company’s plans. Executives had just finished the discussion, these people said, and decided that trimming the fat from Twitter’s rapid expansion over the last two years would be necessary.Twitter’s spending has been rising. In the last quarter for which Twitter reported financial results, costs and expenses totaled $633 million, up 37 percent from a year earlier.The layoffs will most likely affect multiple areas of the company, including the engineering and media teams, according to the people with knowledge of the plans. Exact numbers of those to be affected couldn’t be learned. The technology site Recode earlier reported on the layoffs.Twitter also plans to opt out of a previously planned 100,000-square-foot expansion of its San Francisco headquarters, according to two people familiar with the company’s plans. Twitter had planned to add office space at 1455 Market Street, the building directly across the street from Twitter’s global headquarters. That space also houses Square, the mobile payments start-up that Mr. Dorsey co-founded and leads concurrently as chief. The decision to halt the expansion was earlier reported by The San Francisco Business Times.Twitter’s stock had soared this week since Mr. Dorsey was named permanent chief, partly on Wall Street hopes that stability had entered the company’s executive suite. The shares rose more than 14 percent between Monday and Friday, though they fell in after-hours trading on Friday after news of the layoffs emerged.It has been a busy week for Mr. Dorsey, even without the news of the impending layoffs. On Monday he was named C.E.O., followed by Twitter’s releasing Moments, a new feature to draw in novices, on Tuesday. On Thursday, Mr. Dorsey appeared at an advertising event in New York to show off Twitter’s array of video advertising products.He appears to have little desire to slow down.“My focus is to build teams that move fast, and learn faster,” Mr. Dorsey tweeted in several messages on Monday. “We’re working hard at Twitter to focus our roadmap on a few things we can make really great.”Each Saturday, Farhad Manjoo and Mike Isaac, technology reporters at The New York Times, review the week’s news, offering analysis and maybe a joke or two about the most important developments in the tech industry.Mike: Hello, Farhad! How are you? I just got back from a week of “new hire orientation” for The Times. I’ve been an employee here for 18 months. I guess we run on a slightly different timetable.Farhad: To be fair, 18 months doesn’t seem like nearly enough time to complete a thorough background check on you.Mike: Fair. So, I was sort of checked out of the news flow, but came back to a deluge of tech craziness.Google is doing this thing with a bunch of other tech companies to make web pages load faster on our phones, which is theoretically a good thing. Jet, the online shopping Amazon competitor, killed one of its main business model decisions — to charge for a membership — which seems theoretically like a bad thing (for Jet, at least). And Dell and EMC are considering some sort of giant merger or takeover, which is still in its theoretical stage. Also, I have no idea how to speak intelligently on the cloud — the cloud! — so let’s just tiptoe past that.Farhad: You forgot about the Microsoft event. They made a laptop! With a screen that’s actually a tablet! I thought it was pretty cool. Maybe PCs are cool again?Mike: Zzzzzzzzzzzzz. Oh, sorry. I just fell asleep with my eyes open.So let’s talk about Twitter, a medium in which you and I both do our best work.The company finally has a new chief executive, Jack Dorsey. He also happens to be the old chief. And, incidentally, still the chief executive of another company, Square, which is in the process of an initial public offering of stock. I can barely clothe and feed myself regularly while doing my job, let alone think about running two companies, so suffice it to say that Mr. Dorsey makes me feel bad about myself.But here’s a question people behind the scenes keep asking me: Mr. Dorsey is the new chief executive, but he was also on the board for years as chairman (though no longer) and had a shot earlier in the company’s life span to shape and form Twitter in his own vision. On Friday, we learned that he’s planning a series of cost-saving measures, including layoffs. But beyond that, will Mr. Dorsey’s return actually be a radical departure from all the things that seem to be wrong with Twitter — hard to use, niche product, bunch of spam, not Facebook — or will it be more of the same?Farhad: Let’s split the difference: It will be more of the same, but faster and better — so not really the same at all.Philosophically, I don’t think Mr. Dorsey’s vision for Twitter is radically different from that of Dick Costolo, the old chief executive. They’ve both talked about making Twitter easier for novices by developing new ways of presenting and sorting tweets. And notice that since Mr. Dorsey took over in the summer, he hasn’t made any substantial changes to Twitter’s product team — the team assembled under Mr. Costolo that is tasked with creating new features for Twitter. In fact, this week, Twitter released a major new feature called Moments, which I really like, that has its origins in the Costolo era.But Mr. Dorsey is Twitter’s founder, and he’s also perceived to be a “product guy,” which is Silicon Valley-speak for a willingness to think about how normal people use technology. This might give him special authority within Twitter to take steps that would otherwise have created tension. For instance, he has reportedly thought about dropping or somehow loosening a tweet’s 140-character limit, a move that could make Twitter more appealing to people who find it bizarre (and which, let me just say, I have advocated for a long time). Under any other chief executive, such a move might have seemed blasphemous. But Mr. Dorsey’s the guy who created the 140-character limit in the first place, so maybe he’ll get a pass to change it.Mike: Which, in my mind, makes me question whether Twitter and Medium, the start-up founded by Evan Williams, who helped create Twitter and still sits on its board, will eventually clash and meet somewhere in the middle. But I digress.Farhad: The bigger question is whether it’s too late to save Twitter. Honestly, Twitter is basically my favorite thing in the world, but on most days I just can’t see it catching on widely. Do you disagree?Mike: Here’s something to think about: A few years ago, when I was a full-time Twitter reporter, I wrote that more than one billion people have signed up for Twitter, tried using it and were like “this is lame” and have never returned. I imagine that number has gone up since I last heard about it.So what does it take to persuade the millions who tried Twitter once and were too confused to come back to, um, come back? My guess is probably big email campaigns, which run the risk of annoying people. And, as Mr. Dorsey has said repeatedly, articulating Twitter’s actual reason for being to a mainstream audience. For a company focused on communication and connecting the world, it has been amazingly bad at doing just that for years.In sum, I have no idea what Twitter needs to do, which is fortunately why I am not the chief executive. I just don’t want it to keep stumbling or, dare I say, go away entirely someday. Imagine if you and I had to go to Facebook to broadcast our inane thoughts all day long! What a horrible vision of the future.Farhad: We could always do more newsletters. Let’s go to once a day? Meet back here tomorrow?Mike: I would, but I think I start my next phase of New York Times orientation (or hazing): Delivering the Sunday paper.HONG KONG —  Apple has disabled its news app in China, according to a person with direct knowledge of the situation, the most recent sign of how difficult it can be for foreign companies to manage the strict rules governing media and online expression there.The Apple News app, which the company announced in June, is available only to users in the United States, though it is being tested in Britain and Australia. Customers who already downloaded the app by registering their phones in the United States can still see content in it when they travel overseas — but they have found that it does not work in China.Those in China who look at the top of the Apple News feed, which would normally display a list of selected articles based on a user’s preferred media, instead see an error message: “Can’t refresh right now. News isn’t supported in your current region.”Apple, based in Cupertino, Calif., declined to comment.Greater China is now Apple’s second-largest source of revenue after the United States, with sales of more than $13 billion in the third quarter. That means the company is most likely taking a careful approach to delivering new content, like that on its news app, within China.Beijing generally insists that companies are responsible for censoring content inside China. In Apple’s case, that would mean it would probably have to develop a censorship system — most Chinese companies use a combination of automated software and employees — to eliminate sensitive articles from feeds.For now, Apple seems to be avoiding the problem by completely disabling the service for users in China.Still, even if the company is moving carefully to appease the government, the move is already troubling some users. Larry Salibra, an entrepreneur who founded Pay4Bugs, a software testing service, pointed out the issue last week on Twitter. In a written interview, Mr. Salibra said he found what Apple was doing “very disconcerting.”In a post on Reddit, Mr. Salibra went further, writing, “They’re censoring news content that I downloaded and stored on my device purchased in the USA, before I even enter China just because my phone happens to connect to a Chinese signal floating over the border.”“On device censorship is much different than having your server blocked by the Great Firewall or not enabling a feature for customers with certain country iTunes account,” his post continued. “That Apple has little choice doesn’t make it any less creepy or outrageous.”